District of Columbia statutes.
28-2106

Duties of assignee.

An assignee or trustee, after giving bond, shall collect and take into his possession all the property covered by the assignment, and to that end he may bring suit in his own name to recover debts due or property belonging to the assignor and embraced in the assignment. The court may require the assignor to be examined under oath touching his property, and may make all orders necessary to prevent any fraudulent transfer of or change in the property of the assignor. The assignee or trustee shall return inventories of the assets coming to his hands and, upon the direction of the court, sell and dispose of them; and his conveyance of any property of the assignor, real or personal, transfers the entire title of the assignor therein to the purchaser. When the assets have been converted into money the assignee or trustee shall settle his accounts and make distribution among the creditors, under the direction of the court, according to the usual course of proceeding in creditor’s suits.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 668, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Cross References

Civil jurisdiction, probate, see §§ 11-501 and 11-921.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2106.
1973 Ed., § 28-2106.